Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-622.01
Dangerous dogs; serious bodily injury; penalty; defense.

(1) Any owner whose dangerous dog inflicts on a human being a serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IV felony for a second or subsequent offense, whether or not the same dangerous dog is involved.

(2) It is a defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section that the dangerous dog was, at the time of the infliction of the serious bodily injury, in the custody of or under the direct control of a person other than the owner or the owner's immediate family.

Laws 2009, LB494, § 13.